Washington statutes.
RCW 18.11.075

Secondhand property, when exempt.

The department of licensing may exempt, by rule, secondhand property bought or received on consignment or sold at an auction conducted by a licensed auctioneer or auction company from RCW 19.60.050 or 19.60.055.

[ 1993 c 348 s 1.]